Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8
DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

31-25-801. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the organization of downtown development authorities having the purposes and powers provided in this part 8 will serve a public use; will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants thereof and of the people of this state; will halt or prevent deterioration of property values or structures within central business districts, will halt or prevent the growth of blighted areas within such districts, and will assist municipalities in the development and redevelopment of such districts and in the overall planning to restore or provide for the continuance of the health thereof; and will be of especial benefit to the property within the boundaries of any authority created pursuant to the provisions of this part 8.

The general assembly determines, finds, and declares that because of a number of atypical factors and special conditions concerning downtown development unique to each locality, the rule of strict construction shall have no application to this part 8, but it shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes and objects for which it is intended.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 701, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1472, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1517, § 2, effective July 1.

31-25-802. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means a downtown development authority created pursuant to the provisions of this part 8 in any municipality of this state and any successor to its functions, authority, rights, and obligations.

(1.5) "Blighted area" means an area within the central business district which, by reason of the presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures, predominance of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, unusual topography, defective or unusual conditions of title rendering the title nonmarketable, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the central business district, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use.

"Board" means the board of the authority.

"Central business district" means the area in a municipality which is and traditionally has been the location of the principal business, commercial, financial, service, and governmental center, zoned and used accordingly.

(3.5) "Development project" or "project" means undertakings and activities of an authority or municipality as authorized in this part 8 in a plan of development area for the development or redevelopment of said area in accordance with a plan of development.

"Director" means the chief executive officer of the authority.

(4.5) "District" means the authority or the area within which the authority may exercise its powers.

"Downtown" means a specifically defined area of the municipality in the central business district, established by the governing body of the municipality pursuant to this part 8.

(5.5) "Governing body" means the city council, town council, board of trustees, or other governing board of any municipality of this state.

"Landowner" means the owner in fee of any undivided interest in real property or any improvement permanently affixed thereto within the district. As used in this part 8, "owner in fee" includes a contract purchaser obligated to pay general taxes, an heir, and a devisee under a will admitted to probate and does not include a contract seller of property with respect to which the contract purchaser is deemed to be the owner in fee for purposes of this subsection (6).

(6.2) "Lessee" means the holder of a leasehold interest in real property within the district. As used in this part 8, "leasehold interest" does not include a license or mere contract right to use real property within the district.

(6.4) "Planning board" means the agency designated by the governing body of the municipality which is chiefly responsible for planning in the municipality; and, if no separate agency exists, "planning board" means the governing body of the municipality.

(6.6) "Plan of development" means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for the development or redevelopment of a downtown development area, including all properly approved amendments thereto.

(6.8) "Plan of development area" means an area in the central business district which the board and the governing body designate as appropriate for a development project.

"Public body" means the state of Colorado or any municipality, quasi-municipal corporation, board, commission, authority, or other political subdivision or public corporate body of the state.

"Public facility" includes but is not limited to any streets, parks, plazas, parking facilities, playgrounds, pedestrian malls, rights-of-way, structures, waterways, bridges, lakes, ponds, canals, utility lines or pipes, and buildings, including access routes to any of the foregoing, designed for use by the public generally or used by any public agency with or without charge, whether or not the same is revenue-producing.

"Qualified elector" means a resident, a landowner, or a lessee as said terms are defined in this section. Any landowner or lessee which is not a natural person may vote only if it designates by some official action a representative thereof to cast its ballot. This subsection (9) shall not be construed so as to permit any qualified elector to cast more than one vote, even though any person qualified or lawfully designated may be entitled to cast the vote of more than one qualified elector.

"Resident" means one who is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of Colorado, eighteen years of age or older, who makes his primary dwelling place within the district.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 701, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(3.5), (4.5), (5.5), (6.2), (6.4), (6.6), and (6.8) added and (6), (9), and (10) amended, p. 1472, § 2, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(1.5) added and (3.5) and (6.4) amended, p. 1518, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(6.4), (6.6), (6.8), and (7) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1978, § 108, effective August 5.

31-25-803. Powers of governing body.

The governing body of every municipality in this state may create and establish a downtown development authority, pursuant to the provisions of this part 8, which authority shall have all the powers provided in this part 8 that are authorized by the ordinance, or any amendment thereto, authorizing such authority and which, when established, shall be a body corporate and capable of being a party to suits, proceedings, and contracts, the same as municipalities in this state. Any such authority may be dissolved by ordinance of the governing body, if there is no outstanding indebtedness of the authority or if adequate provision for the payment of such indebtedness has been provided.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 702, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-804. Organizational procedure - election.

When the governing body of a municipality determines it is necessary to establish a downtown development authority for the public health, safety, prosperity, security, and welfare and to carry out the purposes of an authority as stated in section 31-25-801, it shall by ordinance submit, at the next regular election or at a special election called for that purpose, the question of the establishment of a downtown development authority. In the ordinance submitting said question, the governing body shall state the boundaries of the downtown development district within which the authority shall exercise its powers and may provide for submission to the voters of any local government matters arising under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-103 (4), C.R.S. If any such matters are to be submitted to the voters, the election shall be conducted at the time and in the manner required by section 20 of article X of the state constitution. If a majority of the qualified electors voting at the election vote for the establishment of a downtown development authority, the authority shall be established pursuant to the provisions of this part 8.

Any ordinance creating a downtown development authority shall provide that any ordinance or resolution by which bonds are issued pursuant to this part 8 shall specify the maximum net effective interest rate of such bonds.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 702, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1473, § 3, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1518, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1193, § 96, effective July 1.

31-25-805. Board - membership - term of office.

The affairs of the authority shall be under the direct supervision and control of a board consisting of not less than five nor more than eleven members appointed by the governing body. A majority of the members appointed shall reside or own property in the downtown development district.

The board shall be constituted as follows:

At least one member shall be a member of the governing body, appointed to serve at the pleasure of the governing body.

Two members shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

Two members shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the second year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

Two members, if the board consists of seven or more members, shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the third year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

All other members shall be appointed for terms expiring June 30 of the fourth year following the date of the ordinance adopted by the governing body establishing the authority.

A member shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and qualified. After the terms of the initial members of the board have expired, the terms of all members (except any member who is a member of the governing body) shall expire four years from the expiration date of the terms of their predecessors. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term. In any municipality in which the charter provides that the appointive authority is the mayor, the mayor shall make appointments to the board.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 703, § 1, effective April 26.

31-25-806. Board membership - qualifications - nominations - rules - removal.

Each appointed member of the board, except any member from the governing body, shall reside, be a business lessee, or own real property in the downtown development district within the municipality in which the authority is located. A manager, as that term is defined in section 7-90-102, C.R.S., an agent, or an employee of an entity, as that term is defined in section 7-90-102, C.R.S., having its place of business in the downtown development district shall be eligible for appointment to the board. No officer or employee of the municipality where the authority is located, other than any appointee from the governing body, shall be eligible for appointment to the board. Within thirty days after the occurrence of a vacancy, the governing body, except as provided in section 31-25-805 (3), shall appoint a successor.

Before assuming the duties of the office, each appointed member shall qualify by taking and subscribing to the oath of office required of officials of the municipality.

The board shall adopt and promulgate rules governing its procedure, including election of officers, and said rules shall be filed in the office of the clerk. The board shall hold regular meetings in the manner provided in the rules of the board. Special meetings may be held when called in the manner provided in the rules of the board. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public except those dealing with land acquisition or sales, personnel matters, or legal matters. Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but they may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses.

After notice and an opportunity to be heard, an appointed member of the board may be removed for cause by the governing body.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 703, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1136, § 22, effective May 14.

31-25-807. Powers - duties.

The board, subject to the provisions of this part 8 and subject to other applicable provisions of law, shall have all powers customarily vested in the board of directors of a corporation. It shall exercise supervisory control over the activities of the director and the staff of the authority in carrying out the functions authorized by this part 8.

In addition to the powers granted by subsection (1) of this section, the board may:

Appoint and remove a director and other staff members, who shall be employed upon recommendation of the director, and prescribe their duties and fix their compensation which shall be paid from funds available to the authority;

At the request of the governing body, prepare an analysis of economic changes taking place in the central business district of the municipality;

Study and analyze the impact of metropolitan growth upon the central business district;

Plan and propose, within the downtown development area, plans of development for public facilities and other improvements to public or private property of all kinds, including removal, site preparation, renovation, repair, remodeling, reconstruction, or other changes in existing buildings which may be necessary or appropriate to the execution of any such plan which in the opinion of the board will aid and improve the downtown development area;

To implement, as provided in this part 8, any plan of development, whether economic or physical, in the downtown development area as is necessary to carry out its functions;

In cooperation with the planning board and the planning department of the municipality, develop long-range plans designed to carry out the purposes of the authority as stated in section 31-25-801 and to promote the economic growth of the district and may take such steps as may be necessary to persuade property owners and business proprietors to implement such plans to the fullest extent possible;

Retain and fix the compensation of legal counsel to advise the board in the proper performance of its duties;

Make and enter into all contracts necessary or incidental to the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary and subject to subsection (3)(a)(IV) of this section, any such plan of development as originally adopted by the board or as later modified pursuant to this part 8 may, after approval by the governing body of the municipality, contain a provision that taxes, if any, levied after the effective date of the approval of such plan of development by said governing body upon taxable property within the boundaries of the plan of development area each year or that municipal sales taxes collected within said area, or both such taxes, by or for the benefit of any public body shall be divided for a period not to exceed thirty years or such longer period as provided for in subsection (3)(a)(IV) of this section after the effective date of approval by said governing body of such a provision, as follows:

That portion of the taxes which are produced by the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the valuation for assessment of taxable property within the boundaries of the plan of development area last certified prior to the effective date of approval by said governing body of the plan, or, as to an area later added to the boundaries of the plan of development area, the effective date of the modification of the plan, or that portion of municipal sales taxes collected within the boundaries of said development area in the twelve-month period ending on the last day of the month prior to the effective date of approval of said plan, or both such portions, shall be paid into the funds of each such public body as are all other taxes collected by or for said public body.

That portion of said property taxes or all or any portion of said sales taxes, or both, in excess of such amount shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the municipality for the payment of the principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans or advances to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, the municipality for financing or refinancing, in whole or in part, a development project within the boundaries of the plan of development area. Any excess municipal sales tax collection not allocated pursuant to this subparagraph (II) shall be paid into the funds of the municipality. Unless and until the total valuation for assessment of the taxable property within the boundaries of the plan of development area exceeds the base valuation for assessment of the taxable property within such boundaries, as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), all of the taxes levied upon the taxable property in such boundary area shall be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies. Unless and until the total municipal sales tax collections in the plan of development area exceed the base year municipal sales tax collections in such area, as provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), all such sales tax collections shall be paid into the funds of the municipality. When such bonds, loans, advances, and indebtedness, if any, including interest thereon and any premiums due in connection therewith, and including any refunding securities therefor, have been paid, all taxes upon the taxable property or the total municipal sales tax collections, or both, in such boundary area shall be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies.

In calculating and making payments as described in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the county treasurer may offset the authority's pro rata portion of any property taxes that are paid to the authority under the terms of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) and that are subsequently refunded to the taxpayer against any subsequent payments due to the authority for the plan of development area. The authority shall make adequate provision for the return of overpayments in the event that there are not sufficient property taxes due to the authority to offset the authority's pro rata portion of the refunds. The authority may establish a reserve fund for this purpose or enter into an intergovernmental agreement with the governing body of the municipality that established the authority in which the municipality assumes responsibility for the return of the overpayments. The provisions of this subparagraph (III) shall not apply to a city and county.

During the final ten years of the thirty-year period during which a portion of the property taxes or sales taxes, or both, may be allocated to and, when collected, paid into the special fund of the municipality in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the governing body may by ordinance extend the period during which property taxes shall be allocated for one additional extension of twenty years, which extension shall commence upon the expiration of the original thirty-year period, if on the first day of the twenty-year extension period the established base year for the allocation of property taxes pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) is advanced forward by ten years and, subsequent to the completion of the first ten years of the twenty-year extension, the base year is advanced forward by one year for each additional year through the completion of the twenty-year extension. The governing body may also by ordinance extend the period during which sales taxes shall be allocated for one additional extension of twenty years with no change to the established sales tax base year. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subparagraph (IV), any extension authorized pursuant to this subparagraph (IV) may only be considered by the governing body during the final ten years of the original thirty-year period.

In connection with an extension implemented pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (IV), on an annual basis fifty percent of the property taxes levied, or such greater amount as may be set forth in an agreement negotiated by the municipality and the respective public bodies, and allocated in accordance with the requirements of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) shall be paid into the special fund of the municipality and the balance of such taxes shall be paid into the funds of the other public bodies by or for which such taxes are collected. Not later than August 1 of each calendar year, the governing body shall certify to the county assessor an itemized list of the property tax distribution percentages attributable to the special fund of the municipality pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B) from the mill levies to be certified by each public body. When certifying values to taxing entities pursuant to sections 39-1-111 (5), 39-5-121 (2), and 39-5-128, C.R.S., the assessor shall certify only the percentage of increment value attributable to the special fund pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B) as certified by the governing body.

The special fund described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) and the tax moneys paid into such fund may be irrevocably pledged by the municipality for the payment of the principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with such bonds, loans, advances, or indebtedness if the question of issuing such bonds or otherwise providing for such loans, advances, or indebtedness and the question of any such intended pledge are first submitted for approval to the qualified electors of the district at a special election to be held for that purpose. Any such election required by this paragraph (b) shall be called by resolution of the board adopted at a regular or special meeting thereof and approved by the governing body by a vote of a majority of the members thereof at least thirty days prior to such election. Except with respect to the qualifications of electors, such election together with all attendant preparations therefor and proceedings thereafter shall be held and conducted in the manner prescribed by law for the holding and conducting of other regular or special elections in the municipality. This irrevocable pledge shall not extend to any taxes that are placed in a reserve fund to be returned to the county for refunds of overpayments by taxpayers; except that this limitation on the extension of the irrevocable pledge shall not apply to a city and county.

As used in this subsection (3), "taxes" shall include, but not be limited to, all levies authorized to be made on an ad valorem basis upon real and personal property or municipal sales taxes; but nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to require any public body to levy taxes.

In the case of such plan of development areas, school districts which include all or any part of such plan of development area shall be permitted to participate in an advisory capacity with respect to the inclusion in a plan of development of the provision provided for by this subsection (3).

In the event there is a general reassessment of taxable property valuations in any county including all or part of the plan of development area subject to division of valuation for assessment under paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) or a change in the sales tax percentage levied in any municipality including all or part of the downtown development area subject to division of sales taxes under paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the portions of valuations for assessment or sales taxes under both subparagraphs (I) and (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall be proportionately adjusted in accordance with such reassessment or change.

The manner and method by which the requirements of subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) are to be implemented by the county assessors shall be contained in such manuals, appraisal procedures, and instructions, as applicable, that the property tax administrator is authorized to prepare and publish pursuant to section 39-2-109 (1)(e), C.R.S.

An authority shall not actually undertake a development project for a plan of development area unless the governing body, by resolution, has first approved the plan of development which applies to such development project.

Prior to its approval of a plan of development, the governing body shall submit such plan to the planning board of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations. The planning board shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed plan of development to the governing body within thirty days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning board or, if no recommendations are received within said thirty days, without such recommendations, the governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed plan of development prescribed by paragraph (c) of this subsection (4).

The governing body shall hold a public hearing on a plan of development or substantial modification of an approved plan of development after public notice thereof by publication once by one publication during the week immediately preceding the hearing in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality. The notice shall describe the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, shall generally identify the plan of development area covered by the plan, and shall outline the general scope of the development project under consideration.

Following such hearing, the governing body may approve a plan of development if it finds that there is a need to take corrective measures in order to halt or prevent deterioration of property values or structures within the plan of development area or to halt or prevent the growth of blighted areas therein, or any combination thereof, and if it further finds that the plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs and plans of the municipality as a whole, for the development or redevelopment of the plan of development area by the authority and by private enterprise.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 704, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(3) and (4) added, p. 1474, § 4, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(2)(d), (2)(f), (3)(a), (3)(c), (3)(e), and (4)(d) amended, p. 1518, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(3)(a)(II) amended, p. 627, § 36, effective April 2.

L. 2002:

IP(3)(a) amended, p. 1943, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

IP(3)(a) amended and (3)(a)(IV) and (3)(f) added, pp. 974, 975, §§ 1, 2, effective August 5; (3)(a)(III) added and (3)(b) amended, p. 1246, §§ 3, 4, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

IP(3)(a) amended, (HB 13-1295), ch. 314, p. 1656, § 13, effective July 1, 2014.

L. 2019:

IP(3)(a) amended, (HB 19-1240), ch. 264, p. 2503, § 12, effective June 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending the introductory portion of subsection (3)(a), see section 1 of chapter 314, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

31-25-808. Additional and supplemental powers.

In addition and supplemental to the other powers granted by this part 8, the authority shall have all powers, except as limited in the ordinance or any amendments thereto, establishing such authority, necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part 8, including but not limited to the following powers:

To acquire by purchase, lease, license, option, gift, grant, devise, or otherwise any property or any interest therein;

In connection with public facilities, to improve land and to construct, reconstruct, equip, improve, maintain, repair, and operate buildings and other improvements, whether on land of the authority or otherwise;

To lease or sublease as lessor any property owned or leased by it or under its control on such terms and conditions as may be established by the board for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use in accordance with the plan of development;

To sell or otherwise dispose of property of the authority or any interest therein, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions as it may deem necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes and objectives of the authority for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use in accordance with the plan of development;

To fix, charge, and collect fees, rates, tolls, rents, and charges for the use of any property of the authority or any property under its control and to pledge any such revenues in support of any bonds or other obligations of the authority;

To cooperate with the municipality in which the authority is located and any other governmental agency or other public body and to enter into contracts with any such agency or body;

To make to or receive from the municipality or the county in which the authority is located conveyances, leasehold interests, grants, contributions, loans, and any other rights and privileges;

To invest any funds of the authority not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities in which public bodies may invest funds subject to their control pursuant to part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and to redeem any bonds it has issued at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than the redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled;

To deposit any funds not required for immediate disbursement in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the funds of the authority. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

To borrow money on such terms and conditions as the board may approve and to issue bills, notes, bonds, or other evidence of indebtedness therefor and to pledge and hypothecate any property or revenue in support of any such debt;

To demolish and remove buildings and improvements located on, and to install, construct, or reconstruct improvements and facilities, including public facilities, on or about, any land owned by an authority or a municipality, in preparation for conveyance to purchasers or lessees, or otherwise.

Any sale or letting of property by the authority shall be at not less than its fair value (as determined by the authority and the governing body) for uses in accordance with the plan of development. In determining the fair value of real property for such uses, an authority shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in such plan; the restrictions upon and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee; and the objectives of such plan.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 705, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1476, § 5, effective June 19.

L. 79:

(1)(h) amended, p. 1619, § 22, effective June 8.

L. 81:

(1)(b) to (1)(d) amended and (1)(j) and (2) added, pp. 1520, 1521, §§ 6, 7, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(h)(I) amended, p. 1116, § 28, effective July 1.

31-25-809. Authorization of bonds.

By ordinance adopted by the governing body at a regular or special meeting, by a vote of a majority of the members of the governing body, the municipality may issue bonds, payable solely from revenues or from taxes pledged pursuant to section 31-25-807 (3)(b) or from both such revenues and taxes, to pay all or any part of the cost of any project or for furthering any purpose of this part 8.

The governing body, in determining such costs, may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of said bonds; all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses; any discount on the sale of the bonds; the cost of any financial, professional, or other expert advice; contingencies; any administrative, operating, or other expenses of the municipality incurred pursuant to the issuance of such bonds, as may be determined by the governing body; all such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing, acquisition, improvement, equipment, and completion of any development project or for furthering any purpose of this part 8; sufficient provision of reserves for working capital, operation, or maintenance or replacement expense or for payment or security of principal of or interest on any bonds during or after an acquisition or improvement and equipment as the governing body may determine; and reimbursements to any governmental agency or instrumentality for any moneys expended pursuant to agreement on any project or for furthering any purpose of this part 8.

In each such project financed by the proceeds of bonds issued under this part 8, the governing body shall determine the costs of, and may budget a percentage therefrom for, operation and administration of the total cost of the actual project.

The proceeds of the bonds may be expended by the municipality or, with the consent of the municipality, by the authority as agent for, and on behalf of, the municipality. If the proceeds of the bonds are applied for the acquisition of real or personal properties, the governing body may:

Retain title to such properties in its own name and lease or grant licenses or privileges in such properties to the authority in order that the authority may, as principal or agent, exercise its powers with respect to such properties; or

Convey title to such properties to the authority for such consideration and subject to such terms and conditions as the governing body may prescribe without regard to any restriction, limitation, or condition otherwise imposed by statute on the sale or disposition of such properties by a municipality.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire part added, p. 705, § 1, effective April 26.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1476, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(4) added, p. 1521, § 8, effective July 1.